Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.570

Motor vehicle transportation service—Responsibilities—Agreements with other agencies—Alternative fuels and clean technologies.

(1) The department shall direct and be responsible for the acquisition, operation, maintenance, storage, repair, and replacement of state motor vehicles under its control. The department shall utilize state facilities available for the maintenance, repair, and storage of such motor vehicles, and may provide directly or by contract for the maintenance, repair, and servicing of all motor vehicles, and other property related thereto and under its control.

(2) The department may arrange, by agreement with agencies, for the utilization by one of the storage, repair, or maintenance facilities of another, with such provision for charges and credits as may be agreed upon. The department may acquire and maintain storage, repair, and maintenance facilities for the motor vehicles under its control from such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature.

(3)(a) The legislature finds that a clean environment is important and that global warming effects may be offset by decreasing the emissions of harmful compounds from motor vehicles. The legislature further finds that the state is in a position to set an example of large scale use of alternative fuels in motor vehicles and other clean technologies.

(b) The department shall consider the use of state vehicles to conduct field tests on alternative fuels in areas where air pollution constraints may be eased by these optional fuels. These fuels should include but are not limited to gas-powered and electric-powered vehicles.

(c) For planned purchases of vehicles using alternative fuels, the department and other state agencies shall explore opportunities to purchase these vehicles together with the federal government, agencies of other states, other Washington state agencies, local governments, or private organizations for less cost. All state agencies must investigate and determine whether or not they can make clean technologies more cost-effective by combining their purchasing power before completing a planned vehicle purchase.

[ 2002 c 285 s 2; 1989 c 113 s 1; 1982 c 163 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.